District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.81

Scope of practice for cosmetologists.

For the purposes of this part, the term “practice of cosmetology” means providing or offering to the general public for a fee any of the following services solely for cosmetic purposes: bleaching, braiding, coloring, curling, cutting, dressing, eyebrow arching, the use of devices or chemicals to straighten, curl, or wave hair, shampooing, singeing, styling, weaving, or similar work performed upon the face, hair, hairpiece, or wig of a person; electrolysis; esthetics; and manicuring. The practice of cosmetology shall not include shaving or trimming the beard or moustache of a person.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 47-2853.81.